Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.335

Chief of police or marshal—Vacancy.

In the case of a vacancy in the office of chief of police or marshal, all requirements and procedures of RCW 35.21.333 and 35.21.334 shall be followed in filling the vacancy.

[ 1987 c 339 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1987 c 339: See notes following RCW 35.21.333.